Maryland, session 2025, SB0149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1504.
(a) There is a Zero–Emission Vehicle School Bus Transition Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) Interest earnings of the Fund;

SENATE BILL 149
(3) Donations;
(4) Money derived from legal settlements earmarked for the purpose of
transitioning to school buses that are zero–emission vehicles; [and]
(5) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION
AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(6) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
SUBTITLE 17. CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION AND MITIGATION PAYMENT
PROGRAM.
2–1701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE
PROJECT” MEANS AN INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT DESIGNED TO AVOID, MODERATE,
OR REPAIR DAMAGE CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE.
(2) “CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE
PROJECT” INCLUDES PROJECTS TO:
(I) CONSTRUCT SEAWALLS OR OTHER COASTAL DEFENSE
STRUCTURES;
(II) UPGRADE STORMWATER OR SEWER SYSTEMS;
(III) MAKE DEFENSIVE UPGRADES TO ROADS, BRIDGES, RAIL
INFRASTRUCTURE, OR OTHER TRANSIT SYSTEMS;
(IV) PREPARE FOR AND RECOVER FROM HURRICANES AND
OTHER EXTREME WEATHER EVENTS;
(V) RELOCATE, ELEVATE, OR RETROFIT WASTEWATER
TREATMENT PLANTS THAT ARE VULNERABLE TO FLOODING;
(VI) INSTALL HEAT PUMPS AND OTHER CLEAN ENERGY
RETROFITS IN PUBLIC AND PRIVATE BUILDINGS, INCLUDING SCHOOL BUILDINGS;
AND

SENATE BILL 149 5
(VII) RESPOND TO TOXIC ALGAE BLOOMS, THE LOSS OF
AGRICULTURAL TOPSOIL, AND OTHER CLIMATE–DRIVEN ECOSYSTEM THREATS TO
FORESTS, FARMS, AND FISHERIES.
(C) “COAL” INCLUDES:
(1) BITUMINOUS COAL;
(2) ANTHRACITE COAL; AND
(3) LIGNITE.
(D) “COMMUNITY DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECTED BY CLIMATE IMPACTS”
MEANS A COMMUNITY IDENTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–702 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) “CONTROLLED GROUP” MEANS TWO OR MORE ENTITIES TREATED AS A
SINGLE EMPLOYER UNDER:
(1) § 52(A) OR (B) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, WITHOUT
REGARD TO § 1563(B)(2)(C) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; OR
(2) § 414(M) OR (O) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(F) “COST RECOVERY DEMAND” MEANS A CHARGE ASSERTED AGAINST A
RESPONSIBLE PARTY FOR COST RECOVERY PAYMENTS UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(G) “COVERED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS” MEANS THE TOTAL
QUANTITY OF GREENHOUSE GASES RELEASED INTO THE ATMOSPHERE DURING THE
COVERED PERIOD, EXPRESSED IN METRIC TONS OF CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT,
RESULTING FROM THE USE OF FOSSIL FUELS OR PETROLEUM PRODUCTS
EXTRACTED, PRODUCED, REFINED, OR SOLD BY AN ENTITY.
(H) “COVERED PERIOD” MEANS MARCH 21, 1994, THROUGH DECEMBER 31,
2023, BOTH INCLUSIVE.
(I) (1) “CRUDE OIL” MEANS OIL OR PETROLEUM OF ANY KIND AND IN
ANY FORM.
(2) “CRUDE OIL” INCLUDES:
(I) BITUMEN;

SENATE BILL 149
(II) OIL SANDS;
(III) HEAVY OIL;
(IV) CONVENTIONAL AND UNCONVENTIONAL OIL;
(V) SHALE OIL;
(VI) NATURAL GAS LIQUIDS;
(VII) CONDENSATES; AND
(VIII) RELATED FOSSIL FUELS.
(J) “ENTITY” MEANS ANY INDIVIDUAL, TRUSTEE, AGENT, PARTNERSHIP,
ASSOCIATION, CORPORATION, COMPANY, MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION, OR OTHER PERSON, INCLUDING A FOREIGN NATION, THAT HOLDS OR
HELD AN OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN A FOSSIL FUEL BUSINESS DURING THE COVERED
PERIOD.
(K) “FOSSIL FUEL” MEANS COAL, PETROLEUM PRODUCTS, AND FUEL
GASES.
(L) “FOSSIL FUEL BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS ENGAGING IN THE
EXTRACTION OF FOSSIL FUELS OR THE REFINING OF PETROLEUM PRODUCTS.
(M) “FUEL GAS” INCLUDES:
(1) METHANE;
(2) NATURAL GAS;
(3) LIQUEFIED NATURAL GAS; AND
(4) MANUFACTURED FUEL GASES.
(N) “FUND” MEANS THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION AND MITIGATION
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–1705 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(O) “GREENHOUSE GAS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–1202 OF THIS
TITLE.

SENATE BILL 149 7
(P) “NOTICE OF COST RECOVERY DEMAND” MEANS A WRITTEN
COMMUNICATION INFORMING A RESPONSIBLE PARTY OF THE AMOUNT OF THE COST
RECOVERY DEMAND PAYABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(Q) “PETROLEUM PRODUCT” MEANS ANY PRODUCT REFINED OR
RE–REFINED FROM:
(1) SYNTHETIC OR CRUDE OIL; OR
(2) CRUDE OIL EXTRACTED FROM NATURAL GAS LIQUIDS OR OTHER
SOURCES.
(R) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION AND
MITIGATION PAYMENT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–1703 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(S) (1) “QUALIFYING EXPENDITURE” MEANS AN AUTHORIZED PAYMENT
FROM THE FUND IN SUPPORT OF A CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION
INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT.
(2) “QUALIFYING EXPENDITURE” INCLUDES, TO THE EXTENT
AUTHORIZED IN DEPARTMENT REGULATIONS, A PAYMENT TOWARD THE OPERATION
AND MAINTENANCE OF A CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION
INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT.
(T) (1) “RESPONSIBLE PARTY” MEANS AN ENTITY, OR A SUCCESSOR IN
INTEREST TO AN ENTITY, THAT:
(I) DURING ANY PART OF THE COVERED PERIOD, WAS
ENGAGED IN THE TRADE OR BUSINESS OF EXTRACTING FOSSIL FUEL OR REFINING
CRUDE OIL; AND
(II) IS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO BE RESPONSIBLE
FOR MORE THAN 1,000,000,000 TONS OF COVERED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(2) “RESPONSIBLE PARTY” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY PERSON THAT
LACKS SUFFICIENT CONNECTION WITH THE STATE TO SATISFY THE NEXUS
REQUIREMENTS OF THE UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION.
(U) “TOTAL ASSESSED COST OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS” MEANS THE
TOTAL ASSESSED COST TO THE STATE AND ITS RESIDENTS OF COVERED
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS DURING THE COVERED PERIOD, AS DETERMINED BY
THE STATE TREASURER IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1704(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 149
2–1702.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) RELIEVE THE LIABILITY OF AN ENTITY FOR DAMAGES RESULTING
FROM CLIMATE CHANGE, AS PROVIDED BY LAW;
(2) PREEMPT, DISPLACE, OR RESTRICT ANY RIGHT OR REMEDY OF A
PERSON OR UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNDER THE LAW RELATING TO
A PAST, PRESENT, OR FUTURE ALLEGATION OF:
(I) DECEPTION CONCERNING THE EFFECTS OF FOSSIL FUELS
ON CLIMATE CHANGE;
(II) DAMAGE OR INJURY RESULTING FROM THE ROLE OF FOSSIL
FUELS IN CONTRIBUTING TO CLIMATE CHANGE; OR
(III) FAILURE TO AVOID DAMAGE OR INJURY RELATING TO
CLIMATE CHANGE, INCLUDING CLAIMS FOR:
1. NUISANCE;
2. TRESPASS;
3. DESIGN DEFECT;
4. NEGLIGENCE;
5. FAILURE TO WARN;
6. DECEPTIVE OR UNFAIR PRACTICES; OR
7. INJUNCTIVE, DECLARATORY, MONETARY, OR OTHER
FORM OF RELIEF; OR
(3) PREEMPT, SUPERSEDE, OR DISPLACE ANY STATE OR LOCAL LAW,
REGULATION, POLICY, OR PROGRAM THAT:
(I) LIMITS, SETS, OR ENFORCES STANDARDS FOR
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS;

SENATE BILL 149 9
(II) MONITORS, REPORTS, OR KEEPS RECORDS OF
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS;
(III) COLLECTS REVENUE THROUGH FEES OR TAXES; OR
(IV) CONDUCTS OR SUPPORTS INVESTIGATIONS.
(B) (1) EVERY CASE FILED IN A COURT OF THE STATE UNDER STATE LAW
MAY NOT BE EXPRESSLY OR IMPLIEDLY PREEMPTED, DISPLACED, MOOTED, OR
DISMISSED ON ANY OTHER PRUDENTIAL CONSIDERATION ARISING FROM THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) TO THE EXTENT THAT ANY ASPECT OF EVERY CASE FILED IN A
COURT OF THE STATE IS REVIEWED FOR THE APPLICATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
APPLICATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SEVERABLE IN EACH OF ITS APPLICATIONS TO
EVERY PERSON AND CIRCUMSTANCE.
2–1703.
(A) THERE IS A CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION AND MITIGATION
PAYMENT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) SECURE COMPENSATORY PAYMENTS FROM FOSSIL FUEL
BUSINESSES BASED ON A STANDARD OF STRICT LIABILITY IN ORDER TO PROVIDE A
SOURCE OF REVENUE FOR STATE EFFORTS TO:
(I) ADAPT TO AND MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF CLIMATE
CHANGE, INCLUDING THROUGH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF CLIMATE CHANGE
ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS; AND
(II) ADDRESS THE HEALTH IMPACTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE ON
VULNERABLE POPULATIONS;
(2) DETERMINE THE PROPORTIONAL LIABILITY OF RESPONSIBLE
PARTIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1704 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) IMPOSE COST RECOVERY DEMANDS ON RESPONSIBLE PARTIES
AND ISSUE NOTICES OF COST RECOVERY DEMANDS;
(4) ACCEPT AND COLLECT COST RECOVERY PAYMENTS FROM
RESPONSIBLE PARTIES;

SENATE BILL 149
(5) IDENTIFY CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION
INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS WITHIN THE STATE;
(6) DISBURSE FUNDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(7) ENSURE THAT AT LEAST 40% OF THE QUALIFIED EXPENDITURES
FROM THE PROGRAM GO TO CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION
INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS THAT DIRECTLY BENEFIT COMMUNITIES
DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECTED BY CLIMATE IMPACTS.
2–1704.
(A) THE STATE MAY IMPOSE COST RECOVERY DEMANDS ON A RESPONSIBLE
PARTY IF, AT ANY TIME DURING THE COVERED PERIOD, THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY:
(1) DID BUSINESS IN THE STATE;
(2) WAS REGISTERED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE;
(3) WAS APPOINTED AS AN AGENT OF THE STATE; OR
(4) OTHERWISE HAD SUFFICIENT CONTACTS WITH THE STATE TO
GIVE THE STATE JURISDICTION OVER THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH STATE LAW.
(B) (1) A RESPONSIBLE PARTY IS STRICTLY LIABLE, WITHOUT REGARD
TO FAULT, FOR A SHARE OF THE COSTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR
MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS, INCLUDING OPERATING AND
MAINTENANCE COSTS, SUPPORTED BY THE FUND.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, ENTITIES IN A CONTROLLED
GROUP:
(I) SHALL BE TREATED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS A SINGLE
ENTITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF IDENTIFYING RESPONSIBLE PARTIES; AND
(II) ARE JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY LIABLE FOR PAYMENT OF
ANY COST RECOVERY DEMAND OWED BY ANY ENTITY IN THE CONTROLLED GROUP.
(C) (1) WITH RESPECT TO EACH RESPONSIBLE PARTY, THE COST
RECOVERY DEMAND SHALL BE EQUAL TO AN AMOUNT THAT BEARS THE SAME RATIO
TO THE TOTAL ASSESSED COST OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AS THE

SENATE BILL 149 11
RESPONSIBLE PARTY’S APPLICABLE SHARE OF COVERED GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS BEARS TO THE AGGREGATE APPLICABLE SHARES OF ALL RESPONSIBLE
PARTIES’ COVERED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(2) (I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE STATE
TREASURER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER, THE DEPARTMENT, AND
ANY OTHER ENTITY AS DETERMINED BY THE STATE TREASURER, SHALL REPORT TO
THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE SENATE EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT COMMITTEE, THE SENATE JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS
COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE
ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE JUDICIARY
COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON THE TOTAL ASSESSED COST OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(II) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE:
1. A SUMMARY OF THE VARIOUS COST–DRIVING
EFFECTS OF COVERED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS ON THE STATE, INCLUDING
EFFECTS ON PUBLIC HEALTH, NATURAL RESOURCES, BIODIVERSITY, AGRICULTURE,
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, FLOOD PREPAREDNESS AND SAFETY, AND HOUSING,
AND ANY OTHER EFFECT THAT THE STATE TREASURER, IN CONSULTATION WITH
THE COMPTROLLER AND THE DEPARTMENT, DETERMINES TO BE RELEVANT;
2. A CATEGORIZED CALCULATION OF THE COSTS THAT
HAVE BEEN INCURRED AND COSTS THAT ARE PROJECTED TO BE INCURRED BY THE
STATE AND ITS RESIDENTS FOR EACH EFFECT IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH; AND
3. A CATEGORIZED CALCULATION OF THE COSTS THAT
HAVE BEEN INCURRED AND COSTS THAT ARE PROJECTED TO BE INCURRED BY THE
STATE AND ITS RESIDENTS TO MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF COVERED GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS DURING THE COVERED PERIOD.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
RESPONSIBLE PARTY’S APPLICABLE SHARE OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS SHALL
BE THE AMOUNT BY WHICH THE COVERED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY EXCEEDS 1,000,000,000 METRIC TONS.
(2) IF A RESPONSIBLE PARTY OWNS A MINORITY INTEREST OF 10% OR
MORE IN ANOTHER ENTITY, THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY’S APPLICABLE SHARE OF
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS SHALL BE CALCULATED AS THE APPLICABLE SHARE
OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FOR THE ENTITY IN WHICH THE RESPONSIBLE

SENATE BILL 149
PARTY HOLDS A MINORITY INTEREST, AS CALCULATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, MULTIPLIED BY THE PERCENTAGE OF THE MINORITY INTEREST
HELD BY THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY.
(3) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO AN ENTITY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSUME THAT:
(I) 942.5 METRIC TONS OF CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT IS
RELEASED FOR EVERY 1,000,000 POUNDS OF COAL ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE ENTITY;
(II) 432,180 METRIC TONS OF CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT IS
RELEASED FOR EVERY 1,000,000 BARRELS OF CRUDE OIL ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
ENTITY; AND
(III) 53,440 METRIC TONS OF CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT IS
RELEASED FOR EVERY 1,000,000 CUBIC FEET OF FUEL GASES ATTRIBUTABLE TO
THE ENTITY.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADJUST THE COST RECOVERY DEMAND
AMOUNT OF A RESPONSIBLE PARTY THAT REFINES PETROLEUM PRODUCTS OR THAT
IS A SUCCESSOR IN INTEREST TO AN ENTITY THAT REFINES PETROLEUM PRODUCTS,
IF THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY ESTABLISHES TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE
DEPARTMENT THAT:
(1) A PORTION OF THE COST RECOVERY DEMAND AMOUNT WAS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE REFINING OF CRUDE OIL EXTRACTED BY ANOTHER ENTITY;
AND
(2) THE CRUDE OIL EXTRACTED BY THE OTHER ENTITY WAS
ACCOUNTED FOR WHEN THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINED THE COST RECOVERY
DEMAND AMOUNT FOR THE OTHER ENTITY OR A SUCCESSOR IN INTEREST OF THE
OTHER ENTITY.
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
RESPONSIBLE PARTY SHALL PAY THE COST RECOVERY DEMAND AMOUNT IN FULL
ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027.
(2) (I) A RESPONSIBLE PARTY MAY ELECT TO PAY THE COST
RECOVERY DEMAND AMOUNT IN NINE ANNUAL INSTALLMENTS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS PARAGRAPH.

SENATE BILL 149 13
(II) THE FIRST INSTALLMENT SHALL BE PAID ON OR BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND SHALL BE EQUAL TO 20% OF THE TOTAL COST RECOVERY
DEMAND AMOUNT.
(III) EACH SUBSEQUENT INSTALLMENT SHALL BE PAID ON OR
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30 EACH SUBSEQUENT YEAR AND SHALL BE EQUAL TO 10% OF
THE TOTAL COST RECOVERY DEMAND AMOUNT.
(IV) 1. THE UNPAID BALANCE OF ALL REMAINING
INSTALLMENTS SHALL BECOME DUE IMMEDIATELY IF:
A. THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY FAILS TO PAY ANY
INSTALLMENT IN A TIMELY MANNER, AS SPECIFIED IN DEPARTMENT REGULATIONS;
B. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THERE IS A LIQUIDATION OR SALE OF SUBSTANTIALLY ALL
THE ASSETS OF THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY, INCLUDING IN A BANKRUPTCY
PROCEEDING; OR
C. THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY CEASES TO DO BUSINESS.
2. IN THE CASE OF A SALE OF SUBSTANTIALLY ALL THE
ASSETS OF A RESPONSIBLE PARTY, THE REMAINING INSTALLMENTS SHALL NOT
BECOME DUE IMMEDIATELY IF THE BUYER ENTERS INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER WHICH THE BUYER ASSUMES LIABILITY FOR THE REMAINING
INSTALLMENTS DUE UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IN THE SAME MANNER AS IF THE
BUYER WERE THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT COST RECOVERY PAYMENTS
COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION AND
MITIGATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–1705 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) A RESPONSIBLE PARTY MAY REQUEST A HEARING UNDER TITLE 10,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE (ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE
ACT – CONTESTED CASES) TO CONTEST A COST RECOVERY DEMAND MADE BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(I) (1) THE REMEDIES PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION ARE IN ADDITION TO
ANY OTHER REMEDY PROVIDED BY LAW.
(2) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PREVENT A PERSON
FROM PURSUING A CIVIL ACTION OR ANY OTHER REMEDY PROVIDED BY LAW.

SENATE BILL 149
2–1705.
(A) THERE IS A CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION AND MITIGATION FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR STATE
EFFORTS TO ADAPT TO AND MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) COST RECOVERY PAYMENTS DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER
§ 2–1704 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY:
(1) TO PAY:
(I) QUALIFIED EXPENDITURES FOR CLIMATE CHANGE
ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS IDENTIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER § 2–1707 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) REASONABLE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE PROGRAM;
(2) TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO LOCAL JURISDICTIONS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1706 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) FOR THE DEPARTMENT’S COMPREHENSIVE FLOOD
MANAGEMENT GRANT PROGRAM UNDER § 5–803 OF THIS ARTICLE TO IMPLEMENT:

SENATE BILL 149 15
(I) CAPITAL PROJECTS UNDERTAKEN AS PART OF
COMPREHENSIVE FLOOD MANAGEMENT PLANS; AND
(II) INFRASTRUCTURE REPAIRS, WATERSHED RESTORATION,
AND EMERGENCY PROTECTION WORK ASSOCIATED WITH FLOOD EVENTS; AND
(4) TO SUPPORT THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE STATE DISASTER RECOVERY FUND UNDER §
14–110.5 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE FOR DISASTER RECOVERY ASSISTANCE;
(II) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH’S OFFICE OF
MINORITY HEALTH AND HEALTH DISPARITIES IN ADDRESSING THE HEALTH
IMPACTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE ON MINORITY ADULTS, CHILDREN, AND INFANTS;
(III) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH’S COMMUNITY
HEALTH RESOURCES COMMISSION FOR THE HEALTH EQUITY RESOURCE
COMMUNITIES PROGRAM;
(IV) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH’S MEDICAID
ADMINISTRATION TO USE FOR THE STATE MEDICAID PROGRAM;
(V) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES TO
INCORPORATE CLIMATE AND EQUITY PROVISIONS IN LOCAL CRITICAL AREA
PROGRAM GRANTS;
(VI) THE GREAT MARYLAND OUTDOORS FUND UNDER § 5–222
OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE TO SUPPORT CLIMATE EDUCATION AND
ADAPTATION ON PARK LANDS;
(VII) THE WHOLE WATERSHED FUND UNDER § 8–2B–03 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE TO SUPPORT WATERSHED AND COMMUNITY
RESILIENCE;
(VIII) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES IN MANAGING
FLOODING THROUGH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF STREAM RESTORATION AND
NATURAL FILTRATION PROJECTS;
(IX) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES IN
PROVIDING PLANNING GRANTS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO PREPARE FOR
EXTREME FLOODING;

SENATE BILL 149
(X) THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND
UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE FOR:
1. ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROGRAMS BENEFITING
LOW–INCOME AND MODERATE–INCOME HOUSEHOLDS; AND
2. OTHER CLEAN ENERGY INVESTMENTS;
(XI) THE RESILIENCY HUB GRANT PROGRAM FUND UNDER §
9–2015 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE IN DEVELOPING RESILIENCY HUBS
SERVING LOW–INCOME AND MODERATE–INCOME HOUSEHOLDS;
(XII) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT IN SUPPLEMENTING PRE–DISASTER MITIGATION FUNDING
PROVIDED UNDER THE FEDERAL BUILDING RESILIENT INFRASTRUCTURE AND
COMMUNITIES (BRIC) GRANT PROGRAM;
(XIII) THE RESILIENT MARYLAND REVOLVING LOAN FUND
UNDER § 14–110.4 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE;
(XIV) THE CLIMATE CATALYTIC CAPITAL FUND UNDER § 10–855
OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE;
(XV) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT IN PROVIDING GRANTS AND LOANS UNDER THE MARYLAND
WHOLEHOME PROGRAM;
(XVI) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION IN PROVIDING
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO LOW–INCOME AND MODERATE–INCOME HOUSEHOLDS
TO TRANSITION THEIR HOMES OFF FOSSIL FUELS;
(XVII) THE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM GRANT FUND UNDER §
9–2012 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(XVIII) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE IN ATTRACTING
CLEANTECH AND RENEWABLE ENERGY BUSINESSES TO THE STATE;
(XIX) THE DEPARTMENT’S DAM SAFETY PROGRAM UNDER TITLE
5, SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(XX) THE DEPARTMENT IN SUPPLEMENTING FUNDING FOR THE
COMMISSION ON ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE AND SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITIES
UNDER TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 7 OF THIS ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 149 17
(XXI) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FOR THE
STATEWIDE TRANSIT INNOVATION GRANT PROGRAM;
(XXII) THE ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE SCHOOL BUS TRANSITION
FUND UNDER § 2–1504 OF THIS TITLE;
(XXIII) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION FOR THE
MEDIUM–DUTY AND HEAVY–DUTY ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE GRANT PROGRAM
UNDER § 9–2011 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(XXIV) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION FOR THE
ELECTRIC VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT REBATE PROGRAM UNDER § 9–2009
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(XXV) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FOR THE KIM
LAMPHIER BIKEWAYS NETWORK PROGRAM UNDER § 2–608 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(XXVI) THE TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT CAPITAL
GRANT AND REVOLVING LOAN FUND UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(XXVII) THE DEPARTMENT IN HIRING ADDITIONAL STAFF IN
THE DEPARTMENT TO WORK ON INITIATIVES TO PROTECT OVERBURDENED AND
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES, AS DEFINED IN § 1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE, FROM THE
EFFECTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE THROUGH IMPROVEMENTS TO PERMITTING
PROCESSES, COMMUNITY OUTREACH EFFORTS, AND OTHER INITIATIVES;
(XXVIII) THE DEPARTMENT IN HIRING ADDITIONAL STAFF TO
SUPPORT THE DEPARTMENT’S CLIMATE CHANGE PROGRAM;
(XXIX) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION IN HIRING
ADDITIONAL STAFF TO SUPPORT IMPLEMENTATION OF THE EMPOWER MARYLAND
PROGRAM; AND
(XXX) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT IN HIRING ENGINEERING STAFF FOR THE OFFICE OF RESILIENCY TO
WORK ON FLOOD–RELATED ISSUES.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.

SENATE BILL 149
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, AT LEAST 40% OF FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER
THE FUND SHALL BE USED FOR PROJECTS THAT DIRECTLY BENEFIT COMMUNITIES
DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECTED BY CLIMATE IMPACTS.
2–1706.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER A GRANT
PROGRAM FOR THE DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER § 2–1705(F)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE TO LOCAL JURISDICTIONS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING LOCAL
EFFORTS TO ADAPT TO AND MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH:
(1) APPLICATION PROCEDURES FOR THE GRANT PROGRAM;
(2) CRITERIA FOR PRIORITIZING APPLICATIONS UNDER THE GRANT
PROGRAM;
(3) PROCEDURES FOR AWARDING GRANTS UNDER THE GRANT
PROGRAM; AND
(4) ANY OTHER PROCEDURES OR CRITERIA NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
2–1707.
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE REGULATIONS SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) METHODOLOGIES USING THE BEST AVAILABLE SCIENCE TO
IDENTIFY RESPONSIBLE PARTIES AND DETERMINE RESPONSIBLE PARTIES’
APPLICABLE SHARES OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS;
(2) RULES RELATING TO:

SENATE BILL 149 19
(I) REGISTERING ENTITIES DETERMINED TO BE RESPONSIBLE
PARTIES UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(II) ISSUING NOTICES OF COST RECOVERY DEMANDS THAT
SHALL INCLUDE:
1. THE COST RECOVERY DEMAND AMOUNT;
2. THE TIME AND MANNER IN WHICH COST RECOVERY
PAYMENTS MUST BE MADE;
3. THE CONSEQUENCES OF NONPAYMENT OR LATE
PAYMENT; AND
4. INFORMATION REGARDING THE RIGHT TO REQUEST A
CONTESTED CASE HEARING; AND
(III) ACCEPTING PAYMENTS FROM, PURSUING COLLECTION
EFFORTS AGAINST, AND NEGOTIATING SETTLEMENT AGREEMENTS WITH
RESPONSIBLE PARTIES; AND
(3) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, PROCEDURES
FOR IDENTIFYING CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE
PROJECTS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE QUALIFYING EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY BY REGULATION PROVIDE FOR CLIMATE
CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS TO BE IDENTIFIED
FOR FUNDING THROUGH:
(I) LEGISLATIVE BUDGET APPROPRIATIONS;
(II) THE ISSUANCE OF REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS FROM LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS, OR COMMUNITY GROUPS; OR
(III) ANY OTHER METHOD THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS
APPROPRIATE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT AT LEAST 40% OF THE
QUALIFIED EXPENDITURES FROM THE PROGRAM GO TO CLIMATE CHANGE
ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS THAT DIRECTLY BENEFIT
COMMUNITIES DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECTED BY CLIMATE IMPACTS.
2–1708.

SENATE BILL 149
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2028, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE COST RECOVERY PAYMENTS RECEIVED AND THE FUNDING
DISBURSED FROM THE FUND DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR;
(2) THE STATUS OF CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR MITIGATION
INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS FUNDED UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(3) THE PERCENTAGE OF QUALIFIED EXPENDITURES MADE DURING
THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR THAT FUNDED CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTIVE OR
MITIGATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS THAT DIRECTLY BENEFITED
COMMUNITIES DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECTED BY CLIMATE IMPACTS; AND
(4) THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PROGRAM IN ACHIEVING THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THE LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR MAY CONDUCT POST AUDITS OF A
FISCAL AND COMPLIANCE NATURE OF THE FUND AND OF THE APPROPRIATIONS AND
EXPENDITURES MADE FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE COST OF THE FISCAL PORTION OF AN AUDIT SHALL BE PAID
FROM THE FUND AS AN ADMINISTRATIVE COST.
Article – Natural Resources
5–222.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Great Maryland Outdoors Fund.
(b) There is a Great Maryland Outdoors Fund in the Department.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund in accordance with
subsection (j) of this section;
(2) Interest earnings of the Fund; [and]
(3) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION
AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 149 21
(4) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
8–2B–03.
(a) There is a Whole Watershed Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) Revenue distributed to the Fund from:
(i) The Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays 2010 Trust Fund
established under § 8–2A–02 of this title;
(ii) The Bay Restoration Fund established under § 9–1605.2 of the
Environment Article;
(iii) The Clean Water Commerce Account established under §
9–1605.4 of the Environment Article;
(iv) The Maryland Agricultural Land Preservation Fund established
under § 2–505 of the Agriculture Article;
(v) The cost–sharing program established under § 8–702 of the
Agriculture Article; and
(vi) The Waterway Improvement Fund established under § 8–707 of
this title;
(2) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION
AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE;
(3) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
[(3)] (4) Interest earnings; and
[(4)] (5) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
Article – Public Safety
14–110.4.
(b) There is a Resilient Maryland Revolving Loan Fund.

SENATE BILL 149
(h) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) investment and interest earnings of the Fund;
(3) repayments of principal and interest from loans made from the Fund;
(4) money received from the Federal Emergency Management Agency;
[and]
(5) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION
AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE; AND
(6) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
14–110.5.
(b) There is a State Disaster Recovery Fund.
(f) (1) The Governor may include in the annual budget bill an appropriation
to the Fund.
(2) The Fund [shall consist] CONSISTS of:
(i) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) repayments of principal and interest from loans made from the
Fund;
(iii) reimbursements from the federal government or other legal
entities for disaster recovery assistance expenditures made from the Fund;
(iv) FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE
ADAPTATION AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(V) interest earnings of the Fund; and
[(v)] (VI) any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
Article – State Government

SENATE BILL 149 23
9–2012.
(b) There is an Energy Storage System Grant Program in the Administration.
(i) (1) There is an Energy Storage System Grant Fund.
(4) The Fund consists of:
(i) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; [and]
(ii) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE
ADAPTATION AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; AND
(III) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
9–2015.
(b) There is a Resiliency Hub Grant Program Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) grant funding obtained under subsection (k) of this section;
(2) funds distributed to the Fund under § 9–20B–05 of this title and §§
2–110.1 and 13–201 of the Public Utilities Article;
(3) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(4) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION
AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE;
(5) interest earnings; and
[(5)] (6) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:

SENATE BILL 149
(1) all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(3) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans made
from the Fund;
(4) interest and investment earnings on the Fund;
(5) compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article;
(6) money received from any public or private source for the benefit of the
Fund;
(7) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under §
7–207.2(c)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; [and]
(8) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article; AND
(9) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION
AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE.
(I–2) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE ADAPTATION AND
MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE
SHALL BE ACCOUNTED FOR SEPARATELY WITHIN THE FUND AND MAY BE USED FOR:
(1) ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROGRAMS BENEFITING LOW–INCOME AND
MODERATE–INCOME HOUSEHOLDS; AND
(2) OTHER CLEAN ENERGY INVESTMENTS.
Article – Transportation
7–1202.
(a) There is a Transit–Oriented Development Capital Grant and Revolving Loan
Fund.
7–1203.
(a) The purpose of the Fund is to promote the equitable and inclusive
development of transit–oriented developments throughout the State.
(c) (1) The Fund consists of:

SENATE BILL 149 25
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) Money made available for qualifying uses by the Fund from other
governmental sources, including eligible federal funding and the Transportation Trust
Fund;
(iii) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE CLIMATE CHANGE
ADAPTATION AND MITIGATION FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1705 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(IV) Ground rents or land sale proceeds in accordance with §
10–306(c)(2) of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
[(iv)] (V) Payments of principal of and interest on loans made under
this title;
[(v)] (VI) Investment earnings of the Fund; and
[(vi)] (VII) Any other money from any other source, public or private,
accepted for the benefit of the Fund.
(2) Contributions to the Fund under paragraph [(1)(iii)] (1)(IV) of this
subsection shall:
(i) Be separately accounted for in the Fund; and
(ii) Be used only for the benefit of transit–oriented developments in
the same county where the real property subject to the ground rent or land sale is located.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.